dictsource/hu_rules
// Hungarian translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

//  ?1  change pronmunciation of foreign names, some users don't want these rules

.replace
//  allow o,u-circumflex for o,u-double-acute
ô	ő
û	ű

// these consonants following a double letter change it to single
.L01  b c d f g h j k l m n p s t r v w z

.group a
        a          A
     _) a (_       %A
 D00_-) al (_      zAl       // double z for 100-al
 000_-) al (_      Al        // ... but not 1000-al
        ahhoz      Ahoz

.group á
        á          a:
     @) ában (_S4q a:bAn
     @) ának (_S4q a:nAk
     @) ától (_S4q a:to:l
     @) áig (_S3q  a:ig
     @) ára (_S3q  a:R2A

.group b
        b          b
        bb         b:
     @) ban (_S3q  bAn
     @) ben (_S3   bEn

        biz (A     biz,      // bizalmas  etc.
?1      biedermeier bi:dER2ma:jER2
     _) batthiány  bAc:a:n^i
        b (-b      b:        // use long [b:], not two [b]
    b-) b                    // silent after 'bb-'
        bb (-b     b:
   bb-) b                    //silent after bb- part
        bb (-L01   b         // only speak one b if followed by a consonant after the - character

        bb (L01    b         // only speak one b if followed by a consonant
        bbr        bR2       //special exception with always need executing
        bbj        bj        //special exception with always need executing

.group c
        c          ts
        cc         ts:
aká) c (suh ts
        cs         tS
        ccs        tS:
     !) cz         ts        // in names which start with a capital letter
kalapá) csz (en    tSz
        csz        ts|s
finán) c (zs ts
tömlö) c (zár ts
aká) c (zs ts
bohó) c (zs ts
lán) c (zs ts
mala) c (zs ts
pia) c (zs ts
Pia) c (z ts
pia) c (zu ts
pia) c (zö ts
rán) c (zs ts
  papu) cs         tS
    ar) c (cson    ts
  mala) c (sá      ts
    pá) c (só      ts
   pol) c (so      ts
   por) c (sé      ts
   por) c (sz      ts
?1 _sto) ck (holm   k
   har) c (csoport ts
   lán) c (cs      ts
 kudar) c (sorozat ts
 gerin) c          ts
   tán) c (cs      ts
   tán) c (s       ts
 kilen) c (csatorn ts
   ner) c (stóla   ts
  kavi) cs (zátony tS
   har) c (cselek  ts
 külön) c (sé      ts
  mala) c (sül     ts
gyümöl) cs (zs     tS
   fil) c (csiz    ts
   szo) c (segély  ts
   _kó) c (csomó   ts
  árbó) c (csúcs   ts
  árbo) c (csúcs   ts
fegyen) c          ts
        ccs (L01   tS        // only speak one cs if followed by a consonant
        cc (L01    ts        // only speak one c if followed by a consonant
        ccsr       tSR2      //special exception with need always execute
        ccr        tsR2      //special exception
        c (-cs     tstS      //if have end of first word c and after the - character a cs letter pair, need spokening single ts and TS phoneme
    c-) cs                   //not need spokening second cs phoneme
        cs (-ccs   tS:       //this situation need spokening one TS: phoneme
   cs-) ccs                  //not need spokening second tS: phoneme after - character
        c (-c      ts:       // use long [ts:], not two [ts]
    c-) c                    // silent after 'cc-'
        ccs (-ccs  tS:
  ccs-) ccs 
        ccs (-cs   tS:       //need spokening one longer TS: phoneme
  ccs-) cs                   //not need spokening second tS phoneme
        cc (-cs    ts        //if this situation happening, need spokening one ts phoneme
   cc-) cs         tS        //need spokening the TS phoneme after the - character
        cc (-ccs   ts        //need spokening one ts phoneme before the - character
   cc-) ccs        tS        //need spokening shorter tS phoneme after the - character
        cc (-c     ts:       // use long [ts:], not two [ts] if after the - character have only cc letter pair
   cc-) c                    //second ts phoneme not need spokening after the - character
        cc (-L01   ts        // only speak one c if followed by a consonant after the - character
        cs (-cs    tS:       // use long [tS:], not two [tS]
   cs-) cs                   // second tS phoneme not need spokening after - character
        ccs (-L01  tS        // only speak one ts if followed by a consonant after the - character
        cs (-sz    tS|s      //need spokening single ts and single s phoneme
        ccs (-sz   tS|s      //need spokening single ts and single s phoneme
 licen) c (sértés  ts
  _fil) c (csík    ts
  _pia) c (csarnok ts
  _pol) c (csat    ts
 _mala) c (sivít   ts
_kilen) c (csöv    ts
_kilen) c (csomó   ts
szanité) c (cs     ts
 pokró) c (cs      ts
   kul) cs (zörg   tS
 kartá) cs (zápo   tS
 ínyen) c (ség     ts
  bohó) c (sapk    ts
  bohó) c (sipk    ts
 kilen) c (sáv     ts
        cszs       tSZ
 kilen) c (schill  ts
 _bohó) cs         ts|S
   _ar) c (sérül   ts
  _har) csor       ts|SoR2
  _áká) c (söv     ts
  _aká) c (söv     ts
 _bohó) c (sz      ts
   _vi) cc (sor    ts
   tán) cs (ics    tS
   _ér) c (sisak   ts
   _in) cz (éd     ts
_virgon) c (ság    ts
_elmén) c (ség     ts
martaló) c         ts
   _ér) c (sas     ts
 _újon) c          ts
 _kuru) c          ts
 _paló) c (ság     ts
_fejlé) c          ts
  nyol) c (seb     ts
  bará) cs (ágta   tS:
   bér) c (csut    ts
   bér) c (süveg   ts
 bilin) cs (zör    tS
   _ér) c (salak   ts
   _ér) c (cs      ts
   _ér) c (sely    ts
   _ér) c (síp     ts
    ér) cs (ípte   tS
    ér) c (sodr    ts
garabon) c (ser    ts
_laban) c          ts
_kéjen) c          ts
  _ner) c (stólá   ts
 _jege) c          ts
  kavi) cs (z      tS
 kilin) cs (zör    tS
  laza) c          ts
  árbo) c (sud     ts
   _ar) c (seb     ts
nyargon) c (cs     ts
  pere) c (süt     ts
 _prin) c (ség     ts
   _rá) c (ság     ts
 sátán) cs (ap     tS
 suhan) c          ts
udvaron) c (ser    ts
  pere) c (cs      ts
 licen) ccs        ts|tS
  nyol) c (csat    ts
 pokró) c (sá      ts
barká) cs (zen tS
kalapá) cs (zon tS
_kapol) cs tS
lán) c (sor ts
daró) c (cs ts
oroszlán) cs (or tS
harmin) c (sor ts
he) cc (sajt ts
ccsz ts|s
ifjon) c (csap ts
kapo) cs (zár tS
ketre) c (cs ts
ketre) c (so ts
kul) cs (zen tS
lán) c (seb ts
lidér) c (cs ts
mala) c (cs ts
matra) c (sor ts
nyol) c (sark ts
nyol) c (sej ts
nyol) c (sug ts
párdu) c (cs ts
kar) c (sor ts
szendvi) cs (zab tS
tán) cs (i tS
tanon) c (cs ts
titán) cs tS
torná) c (sor ts
ujjper) c (cs ts
ccsz ts|s
_ér) c (saru ts
har) c (stí ts
kul) cs (zör tS
lé) c (zsaluzato ts
ia) c (zár ts
án) c (zen ts
ar) c (csap ts
ar) c (csi ts
ar) c (csó ts
ar) c (sej ts
_ar) c (sim ts
bunyevá) c (s ts
mala) c (s ts
pö) cs (z tS
riban) c (sé ts
kedven) c (sé ts
bon) c (seg ts
per) c (skál ts
makove) czc (el ts:
makove) cz ts
r) czs ts|Z
csú) cs (z tS
r) c (zú ts
_ar) c (za ts
orbán) c (cs ts
_nyol) c (s ts
nyol) c (cs ts
pia) c (za ts
teker) cs (z tS
ron) cs (z tS	For example abroncszabáló, abroncszörej words
ar) c (stíl ts	For example arcstílusok word
kilen) c (seb ts	For example kilencsebességes word
kilen) c (so ts	For example kilencsoros word
kilen) c (stróf ts
por) c (cs ts	For example porccsontjára word
kuka) c (zab ts
matra) c (s ts	For example matracstúdió word
bohó) c (cs ts	For example bohóccsapat word
_lé) c (sor ts	For example lécsora word
kreden) c (s ts	For example kredencsarok word
tengeli) c (cs ts	For example tengeliccsapatból word
bakan) cs (z tS	For example bakancszokni word
bilin) cs (z tS	For example bilincszuhatagot word
gyümöl) cs (z tS	For example gyümölcszaj word
kul) cs (z tS	For example kulcszóna word
me) ccs (z tS:	For example meccszárás word
kin) cs (z tS	For example kincszabrálás word
naran) cs (z tS	For example narancszamat word
szendvi) cs (z tS	For example szendvicszacskó word
sziva) cs (z tS	For example szivacszátony word
por) c (sej ts	For example porcsejt word
pia) c (sok ts	For example piacsokk word
pia) c (sor ts	For example piacsor word
_ar) c (sa ts	For example arcsaw word
ar) c (sál ts	For example arcsál word
ar) c (sáp ts	For example arcsápadtsággal word
pere) c (st ts	For example perecstílus word
gerin) cc (A ts:	For example gerinccel word
ar) c (cse ts	For example arccsere word
matra) c (cs ts	// For example matraccsalád, matraccsere words
rán) c (cs ts	For example ránccsökkentő word
ar) c (csí ts	For example arccsípés word
pia) c (csi ts	For example piaccsinálás word
lé) c (st ts	For example lécstruktúra word
román) c (so ts	For example románcsorozata word
cellaza) cs (k tS	For example cellazacskó word
per) cs (t ts|S	For example percstílus word
har) cs (ik ts|S	For example párharcsikerét word
_aká) c (so ts	For example akácsor word
án) c (za ts	For example lánczavarok word
án) c (zá ts	For example lánczár word
per) c (cs ts
aká) c (sarj ts
c (zsák ts
ilin) cs (z tS
metán) cs tS
platán) cs tS
párdu) c (s ts
béren) c (s ts
tán) c (sik ts
pol) c (csík ts
pol) c (cs ts
kapol) ccs (al tS:
rovar) cs (á tS
per) cs (ej ts|S
per) cs (oránál ts|S
ar) c (spor ts
kudar) c (sp ts
ar) c (smink ts
har) c (str ts
rán) c (sim ts
orángután) cs tS
orangután) cs tS
laza) cc (a ts:
fil) c (sor ts
ar) ch (eg ts|h
zomán) c (s ts
kvar) c (cs ts
mala) c (hát ts
pere) c (só ts
dú) c (süv ts
ér) cs (ípő tS
jampe) c (s ts
_tanon) c (ság ts
pere) czs (em ts|Z
licen) c (s ts
feren) c (csák ts
ar) c (sor ts
ková) cs (ze tS
dú) c (sejt ts
aká) c (salá ts
kó) c (sepr ts
kilen) c (sá ts
kilen) c (sí ts
lé) c (csalá ts
aká) c (cse ts
lé) c (soros ts
árbó) c (cs ts
daró) cz (ubb ts|z
teknő) c (cs ts
stru) cc (so ts
ér) c (sikoly ts
sán) c (cs ts
ar) c (csúf ts
durbin) cs (z tS
ar) c (struk ts
gi) ccs (z tS
pia) c (st ts
pia) cs (erk ts|S
pia) c (sark ts
pia) c (sért ts
pia) c (spec ts
rovar) cs tS
lé) cs (ord tS
har) c (stat ts
nyápi) c (s ts
gombó) c (cs ts
pere) c (sal ts
bohó) c (s ts
bohó) c (z ts
lán) c (str ts
lán) c (zör ts
magon) c (cs ts
fil) c (z ts
lán) cs (í ts|S
lán) c (sodr ts
lán) c (sokk ts
lán) c (sp ts
pol) c (sark ts
vi) cc (sör ts
lé) c (sárk ts
mufur) c (s ts
riban) c (cs ts
ér) c (zó ts
pá) c (csir ts
pá) c (sül ts
lidér) c (s ts
stru) cc (s ts
román) c (cs ts
tán) c (zs ts
ar) c (zón ts
pia) c (csop ts
aká) c (sor ts
har) c (sis ts
ér) cz (ab ts|z
gombó) c (s ts
por) c (sor ts
lán) c (star ts
gó) c (zón ts
ar) c (csop ts
ar) c (seb ts
pia) c (sta ts
extrémala) cs (on tS
ba) cch (á hh
falé) c (so ts

.group C
C ts
TÁN) C (ZEN ts

.group ch
  anar) ch (i      h
 balda) ch (in     h
hierar) ch (i      h
    me) ch (a      h
    te) ch         h
  pszi) ch         h
  pszy) ch         h
   mün) ch (en     C
  maso) ch (istA   h
 monar) ch (i      h
   _pe) ch         h:
   szé) ch         tS
   _zi) ch (y      tS
  _szé) che (ny    tSe:
  _szé) ché (ny    tSe:
    ja) ch (t      h
    ce) ch (et     h:
    or) ch (ídea   h
  stri) ch (el     h:
    ar) ch (ív     h
    ar) ch (ivál   h
    ar) ch (itektú h
    ma) ch (iná    h
oligar) ch         h
 legpe) ch (es     h:
  mazo) ch (izm    h
  mazo) ch (is     h
    ar) ch (aikus  h
   _ar) ch (imé    h
diszti) ch (on     h
    ma) ch (iavell h
   _or) ch (ide    h
almana) ch         h
kronoszti) ch (on  h
  arca) ch (on     h
sza) ch (arid h
szto) ch (aszti h
a) ch (aem h
a) ch (át h
a) ch (illes h
ti) ch (on h
arca) ch (on h
ba) ch h
blaskovi) ch tS
?1 chip tSip
?1 damjani) ch tS
eu) ch (arisz h
eunu) ch h
fa) ch h
fis) ch (er
forgá) ch tS
grassalkovi) ch tS
ri) ch (ter C
jurisi) chcs tS:
jurisi) ch tS
keglevi) ch tS
s) ch (illing
le) ch (ner h
mala) ch (it h
metterni) ch C
 pé) ch (y tS
pejacsevi) ch tS
kra) ch h
tri) ch (in h
e) ch (ó h
di) ch (otó h
hipo) ch (ond h
bre) ch (t h
sza) ch (ar h
patriar) ch h
or) ch (i h	For example orchidea word
damjani) ch tS	For example Damjanich word
damjani) chcs tS:	For example Damjanichcsal word
ar) ch (e h
ar) ch (el ts|h
kudar) ch (e ts|h
har) ch (e ts|h
ar) ch (aiku h
ar) ch (abi h
ar) ch (aiz h
ar) ch (itekt h
exar) ch h
matriar) ch h
tetrar) ch h
e) ch (te h
ar) ch (enge ts|h
eu) ch (ari h
tri) ch (ot h
tra) ch (e h
ya) ch (t h
